Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,218
Attorney General; authority.

The Attorney General shall represent the state and employees of the state in any suit brought under the State Tort Claims Act and is authorized to compromise or settle any such suit with the approval of the court in which such suit is pending.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 10, p. 2848;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 29;

Laws 1989, LB 541, § 5.